Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1702
Request for siting approval.

Prior to submitting an application to the department for a solid waste disposal area or solid waste processing facility, the applicant shall submit a request for siting approval to the city council, village board of trustees, or county board of commissioners or supervisors which governs the city, village, or county in which the proposed site is to be located. The city council, village board, or county board shall approve or disapprove the site for each solid waste disposal area or solid waste processing facility.

Laws 1991, LB 813, § 2.